Washington statutes.
RCW 15.35.110

Referendum on establishing or discontinuing market area pooling arrangement.

(1) The director, either upon his or her own motion or upon petition by ten percent of the producers in any proposed area, shall conduct a hearing to determine whether to establish or discontinue a market area pooling arrangement. Upon determination by the director that in order to satisfy the purposes of this chapter a pooling arrangement should be established, a referendum of affected individual producers and milk dealers shall be conducted by the department.

(2) In order for the director to establish a market area and pooling plan:

(a) Sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the producers and producer-dealers that vote must be in favor of establishing a market area and pooling plan;

(b) Sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the milk dealers and producer-dealers that vote must be in favor of establishing a market area and pooling plan; and

(c) Producer-dealers providing notice to the director under RCW 15.35.115(1), shall be authorized to vote both as producers and as milk dealers.

(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the director, within ninety days from the date the results of a referendum approved under subsection (2) of this section are filed with the secretary of state, shall adopt rules to establish a market pool in the market area, as provided for in this chapter. In conducting hearings on rules proposed for adoption under this subsection, the director shall invite public comment on whether milk regulation similar to the market area pooling plan proposed in the rules exists in neighboring states and whether a lack of such milk regulation in neighboring states would render such a market area pooling plan in this state ineffective or impractical.

(4) If, following hearings held under subsection (3) of this section, the director determines that the lack of milk regulation in neighboring states similar to the market area pooling plan proposed for this state would render such a pooling arrangement in this state ineffective or impractical, the director shall so state in writing. The director shall file the statement with the code reviser for publication in the Washington State Register. In such a case, a market area pooling plan shall not be established in the market area under subsection (3) of this section based upon the referendum that precipitated the hearings.

If the director determines that such a lack of milk regulation in neighboring states would not render such a market area pooling plan ineffective or impractical in this state, the director shall adopt rules in accordance with subsection (3) of this section.

(5) If fifty-one percent of the producers and producer-dealers voting representing fifty-one percent of the milk produced and fifty-one percent of the milk dealers and producer-dealers in the market area vote to terminate a pooling plan, the director, within one hundred twenty days, shall terminate all the provisions of said market area and pooling arrangement.

(6) A referendum of affected producers, producer-dealers, and milk dealers shall be conducted only when a market area pooling arrangement is to be established. Only producers, milk dealers, and producer-dealers who are subject to the plan may vote on the termination of a pooling plan.

[ 1993 c 345 s 8; 1992 c 58 s 4; 1991 c 239 s 8; 1971 ex.s. c 230 s 11.]